Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-697.02
Borrowing; authorized; bonds; approval of electors; mayor and city council; duties; issuance of refunding bonds; approval of electors.

(1) The mayor and city council of any city of the first class shall have power to borrow money and pledge the property and credit of the city upon its negotiable bonds or otherwise, for the purpose of purchasing and improving land for parks, recreational facilities, and public grounds, authority therefor having first been obtained by a majority vote of the qualified electors of the city voting on such question at any general city election of such city or at an election called for that purpose, upon a proposition or propositions submitted in the manner provided by law for the submission of propositions to aid in the construction of railroads and other works of internal improvement.

(2) The mayor and city council shall identify the specific type of security pledge securing any financing or bond issue in the proposition to borrow money and pledge the property and credit of the city upon its negotiable bonds or otherwise for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section. The proposition with language identifying the specific type of security pledged to be used shall be placed on the ballot to be voted on by the qualified electors of the city.

(3) If the mayor and city council decide to issue refunding bonds under section 10-142 for bonds issued pursuant to this section that change the specific type of security pledged from revenue bonds to general obligation bonds, authority therefor must first be obtained by a majority vote of the qualified electors of the city voting on such refinancing proposition at any general city election of such city or at an election called for that purpose.

Laws 1899, c. 15, § 2, p. 81;

Laws 1913, c. 190, § 1, p. 567;

R.S.1913, § 5272;

C.S.1922, § 4491;

C.S.1929, § 19-102;

R.S.1943, § 19-102;

Laws 1969, c. 86, § 7, p. 433;

Laws 2016, LB378, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 158.